en: Aftershave
xx: Aftershave
cs: Vody po holení
da: Aftershave
de: Rasierwasser
es: Loción para después de afeitarse
fr: Après-rasage
it: Dopobarba
ja: アフターシェーブ
nl: Aftershaves
no: Etterbarberingsvann
pl: Płyny po goleniu
pt: Loção pós-barba
ru: Лосьон после бритья
sv: Aftershave
tr: Tıraş Losyonları

en: Body & Facial Hair Bleach
xx: Body & Facial Hair Bleach
cs: Zesvětlovače chloupků na těle a obličeji
da: Hårblegemiddel til krop og ansigt
de: Haaraufheller
es: Decolorante para pelo corporal y facial
fr: Produits de décoloration des poils
it: Decolorante per peli di corpo e viso
ja: 顔・体用脱色剤
nl: Bleekmiddel voor lichaams- en gezichtshaar
no: Blekemiddel for kropps- og ansiktshår
pl: Rozjaśniacze owłosienia twarzy i ciała
pt: Clareadores de pelos para o corpo e rosto
ru: Средства для обесцвечивания волос на лице и теле
sv: Blekningsmedel för kropps- och ansiktshår
tr: Vücut ve Yüz Tüyü Ağartıcısı

en: Electric Razor Accessories
xx: Electric Razor Accessories
cs: Elektrické holicí strojky – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til elektriske barbermaskiner
de: Zubehör für elektrische Rasierer
es: Accesorios para afeitadoras eléctricas
fr: Accessoires pour rasoir électrique
it: Accessori rasoi elettrici
ja: 電動シェーバー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor elektrische scheerapparaten
no: Tilbehør til elektriske barbermaskiner
pl: Akcesoria do golarek elektrycznych
pt: Acessórios para barbeadores elétricos
ru: Принадлежности для электробритв
sv: Tillbehör till rakapparater
tr: Tıraş Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Electric Razors
xx: Electric Razors
cs: Elektrické holicí strojky
da: Elektriske barbermaskiner
de: Elektrorasierer
es: Máquinas de afeitar eléctricas
fr: Rasoirs électriques, Rasoir électrique
it: Rasoi elettrici
ja: 電動シェーバー
nl: Elektrische scheerapparaten
no: Elektriske barbermaskiner
pl: Golarki elektryczne
pt: Barbeadores elétricos
ru: Электробритвы
sv: Elektriska rakapparater
tr: Tıraş Makineleri

en: Hair Clipper & Trimmer Accessories
xx: Hair Clipper & Trimmer Accessories
cs: Strojky na stříhání vlasů – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til hårklippere og trimmere
de: Zubehör für Haarschneidegeräte & Trimmer
es: Accesorios para recortadores y cortadores de pelo
fr: Accessoires pour tondeuses à cheveux
it: Accessori per tagliacapelli e tagliabasette
ja: バリカン・鼻毛カッター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor tondeuses
no: Tilbehør til hårklippere og trimmere
pl: Akcesoria do trymerów do włosów
pt: Acessórios para aparadores de cabelo
ru: Принадлежности для триммеров и машинок для стрижки волос
sv: Tillbehör till hårklippare och trimmers
tr: Saç Kesme ve Düzeltme Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Hair Clippers & Trimmers
xx: Hair Clippers & Trimmers
cs: Strojky na stříhání vlasů
da: Hårklippere og trimmere
de: Haar- & Bartschneider
es: Recortadores y cortadores de pelo
fr: Tondeuses à cheveux
it: Tagliacapelli e tagliabasette
ja: バリカン・鼻毛カッター
nl: Tondeuses en trimmers
no: Hårklippere og trimmere
pl: Trymery do włosów
pt: Máquinas e tesouras para cortar cabelo
ru: Триммеры и машинки для стрижки волос
sv: Hårklippare och trimmers
tr: Saç Kesme ve Düzeltme Makineleri

en: Hair clipper oils, Clipper oils
ar: زيت ماكينة قص الشعر
de: Klingenöl
es: Olio per tosatrice
fr: Huile pour tondeuse
it: Olio per tosatrice
nl: Tondeuseolie
pl: Oliwa do maszynki do strzyżenia
pt: Óleo protetivo para lâmina
ru: Масло для машинки для
sv: Klippmaskinoljor

en: Hair Removal
xx: Hair Removal
cs: Odstraňování chloupků
da: Hårfjerning
de: Haarentfernung
es: Depilación
fr: Épilation
it: Depilazione
ja: 脱毛
nl: Ontharing
no: Hårfjerning
pl: Usuwanie włosów
pt: Depilação
ru: Средства для удаления волос
sv: Hårborttagning
tr: Tüy Alma

en: Depilatories
xx: Depilatories
cs: Depilátory
da: Depilatorer
de: Enthaarungsmittel
es: Productos depilatorios
fr: Crèmes dépilatoires
it: Depilatori
ja: 脱毛剤
nl: Ontharingsproducten
no: Hårfjerningsmidler
pl: Depilatory
pt: Cremes depilatórios
ru: Средства для эпиляции
sv: Hårborttagningsmedel
tr: Tüy Dökücü Kremler

en: Electrolysis Devices
xx: Electrolysis Devices
cs: Elektrolytická zařízení
da: Elektrolyseenheder
de: Elektrolysegeräte
es: Aparatos para la depilación por electrólisis
fr: Appareils à électrolyse
it: Dispositivi per elettrolisi
ja: 高周波脱毛器
nl: Elektrolyseapparaten
no: Elektrolyseapparater
pl: Urządzenia do depilacji metodą elektrolizy
pt: Aparelhos de eletrólise
ru: Устройства для электролиза
sv: Elektrolysenheter
tr: Elektroliz Cihazları

en: Epilators
xx: Epilators
cs: Epilátory
da: Epilatorer
de: Epilatoren
es: Depiladoras
fr: Épilateurs
it: Epilatori
ja: 電気脱毛器
nl: Epileerapparaten
no: Epilatorer
pl: Epilatory
pt: Depiladores
ru: Эпиляторы
sv: Epilatorer
tr: Epilatörler

en: Hair Removal Wax Warmers
xx: Hair Removal Wax Warmers
cs: Ohřívače depilačního vosku
da: Opvarmning af hårfjerningsvoks
de: Enthaarungswachs-Wärmer
es: Calentadores de cera para depilación
fr: Chauffe-cire
it: Scaldacera per depilazione
ja: 脱毛ワックスウォーマー
nl: Warmers voor ontharingswas
no: Voksvarmere for hårfjerning
pl: Podgrzewacze do wosku do depilacji
pt: Aquecedores de cera para depilação
ru: Нагреватели воска для удаления волос
sv: Värmeapparater för hårborttagningsvax
tr: Ağda Isıtıcılar

en: Laser & IPL Hair Removal Devices
xx: Laser & IPL Hair Removal Devices
cs: Depilační lasery a IPL
da: IPL- og laserapparater til hårfjerning
de: Laserhaarentfernung
es: Aparatos de depilación láser e IPL
fr: Épilateurs laser et à la lumière pulsée
it: Dispositivi per la depilazione laser e a luce pulsata
ja: レーザー脱毛器
nl: Laser- en IPL-ontharingsapparaten
no: Laser- og IPL-apparater for hårfjerning
pl: Urządzenia do depilacji laserowej i IPL
pt: Aparelhos para remoção de pelos a laser
ru: Устройства для лазерной эпиляции
sv: Laser- och IPL-apparater för hårborttagning
tr: Lazer ve IPL Epilasyon Cihazları

en: Waxing Kits & Supplies
xx: Waxing Kits & Supplies
cs: Voskové depilační sady a materiály
da: Vokssæt
de: Waxing-Sets & Zubehör
es: Kits y suministros de cera
fr: Kits et accessoires d'épilation à la cire
it: Prodotti e kit per depilazione con cera
ja: 脱毛ワックス用品
nl: Harssets en -benodigdheden
no: Vokssett og tilbehør
pl: Zestawy do depilacji woskiem
pt: Kits e suprimentos para depilação com cera
ru: Средства для восковой эпиляции
sv: Vaxningspaket
tr: Ağda Setleri ve Malzemeleri

en: Razors & Razor Blades
xx: Razors & Razor Blades
cs: Břitvy a žiletky
da: Barberknive og barberblade
de: Rasierer & Rasierklingen
es: Afeitadoras y cuchillas
fr: Rasoirs et lames de rasoir
it: Rasoi e lame per rasoi
ja: シェーバー・替刃
nl: Scheerapparaten en scheermessen
no: Barberhøvler og barberblader
pl: Maszynki i ostrza do golenia
pt: Navalhas e lâminas de barbear
ru: Бритвы и бритвенные лезвия
sv: Rakhyvlar och rakblad
tr: Jiletler ve Usturalar

en: Shaving Bowls & Mugs
xx: Shaving Bowls & Mugs
cs: Misky a hrnky na holení
da: Skåle og kopper til barbering
de: Rasierschalen
es: Boles y tazas de afeitado
fr: Bols à raser
it: Ciotole e tazze per rasatura
ja: シェービングボウル
nl: Scheerkommen en -bakjes
no: Skåler og kopper til barbering
pl: Miseczki i kubki do golenia
pt: Tigelas e canecas de barbear
ru: Миски и чашки для бритья
sv: Rakskålar och -muggar
tr: Traş Kaseleri ve Kupaları

en: Shaving Brushes
xx: Shaving Brushes
cs: Štětky na holení
da: Barberbørster
de: Rasierpinsel
es: Brochas de afeitar
fr: Blaireaux
it: Pennelli da barba
ja: シェービングブラシ
nl: Scheerkwasten
no: Barberkoster
pl: Pędzle do golenia
pt: Pincéis de barba
ru: Кисточки для бритья
sv: Rakborstar
tr: Tıraş Fırçaları

en: Shaving Cream
xx: Shaving Cream
cs: Krémy na holení
da: Barberskum
de: Rasiercreme
es: Crema de afeitar
fr: Mousses à raser
it: Crema da barba
ja: シェービングクリーム
nl: Scheerschuim
no: Barberkrem
pl: Kremy do golenia
pt: Cremes de barbear
ru: Кремы для бритья
sv: Rakkräm
tr: Tıraş Kremleri

en: Shaving Kits
xx: Shaving Kits
cs: Sady na holení
da: Barbersæt
de: Rasiersets
es: Kits de afeitado
fr: Coffrets de rasage
it: Kit da barba
ja: シェービングキット
nl: Scheerkits
no: Barbersett
pl: Zestawy do golenia
pt: Kits de barbear
ru: Наборы для бритья
sv: Rakningspaket
tr: Tıraş Setleri

en: Styptic Pencils
xx: Styptic Pencils
cs: Prostředky proti krvácení
da: Alunstifter
de: Alaunstifte
es: Lápiz estíptico
fr: Crayons styptiques
it: Matite emostatiche
ja: 鉛筆型止血剤
nl: Styptische potloden
no: Blodstillende penner
pl: Sztyfty do tamowania krwawienia
pt: Lápis vasoconstritor
ru: Кровоостанавливающие карандаши
sv: Alunstift
tr: Yara Kalemleri